Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 44
WATER USERS' ASSOCIATIONS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

Section

7-44-101. Tax exemptions - fees.

Any water users' association that is organized in conformity with the requirements of the United States under the reclamation act of June 17, 1902, and that, under its articles of incorporation, is authorized to furnish water only to its stockholders, shall be exempt from the payment of any income tax and from the payment of any annual franchise tax but shall be required to pay, as preliminary to its incorporation, a fee that shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., for the filing and recording of its articles of incorporation.

Source:

L. 05:

p. 360, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1000.

C.L.

§ 2367.

CSA:

C. 41, § 155.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 430, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 23, § 15, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the "National Irrigation Act of 1902", also known as the "Reclamation Act" or the "Newlands Reclamation Act", see 43 U.S.C. § 371 et seq.

7-44-102. Stock subscription record.

Any water users' association organized in conformity with the requirements of the United States under the reclamation act of June 17, 1902, with the consent of the board of county commissioners, may furnish the clerk and recorder of any county in Colorado a book containing printed copies of its articles of incorporation and forms of subscription for stock; and the county clerk and recorder to whom such book is furnished shall use the same for recording the stock subscriptions in such association, and the charges for the recording thereof shall be made on the basis of the number of words actually written therein.

Source:

L. 05:

p. 361, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1001.

C.L.

§ 2368.

CSA:

C. 41, § 156.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-2.

Cross references:

For the "National Irrigation Act of 1902", also known as the "Reclamation Act" or the "Newlands Reclamation Act", see 43 U.S.C. § 371 et seq.

7-44-103. Organization - assessments.

A corporation known as a water users' association may be formed under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title, or formed under or elect to be governed by the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, for the purpose of dealing, contracting, or cooperating with the United States under the provisions of the act of congress of June 17, 1902, and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto for the securing of a water supply or irrigation works, or both. It has, in addition to the powers conferred by law upon ditch, canal, or irrigation companies, the power to make assessments other than on a pro rata basis for the purpose of raising funds to accomplish the purposes for which formed, or to pay its debts or obligations, or to secure reduction in the principal debt due the United States of America for reclamation project construction cost, or delinquent assessments, or charges already due and payable, when the articles of incorporation so permit, or when required under existing or future contracts between the United States and the association or between the association and its stockholders, or under any laws or regulations of the United States.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 291, § 1.

CSA:

C. 41, § 157.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-3.

L. 67:

p. 657, § 7.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 757, § 11, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2208, § 22, effective July 1, 2004.

Cross references:

For the "National Irrigation Act of 1902", also known as the "Reclamation Act" or the "Newlands Reclamation Act", see 43 U.S.C. § 371 et seq.

7-44-104. Directors may file petition in district court.

The board of directors of any water users' association formed under section 7-44-103 at any time may file a petition in the district court of the county in which the office of such water users' association is situated praying a judicial examination and determination of the question of the validity of the organization of the association, or of any power conferred by the articles of incorporation, or of any amendment to the articles of incorporation, or of any assessment levied, or of any act, proceeding, or contract of the association. Such petition shall state the facts wherein the validity of such organization, power conferred by the articles of incorporation, amendment to the articles of incorporation, assessment, act, proceeding, or contract is founded and shall be verified by a member of the board. Thereupon a notice in the nature of a summons shall issue under the hand and seal of the clerk of said court, directed to all stockholders, creditors, or other persons interested in said water users' association, naming it, which designation shall be deemed sufficient to give the court jurisdiction of all matters and parties involved and interested. Service shall be obtained by publication of such notice as in the case of publication of summons in an action to quiet title to real property.

Any stockholder, creditor, or other interested person may answer such petition within the time allowed therefor. All persons filing answers shall be entered as defendants in the cause and their several defenses consolidated for hearing or trial. Upon hearing, the court shall examine all things affecting the validity of the matter in controversy, shall make a finding with reference thereto, and shall enter judgment and decree as the case warrants. In reaching its conclusions in such causes, the court shall follow a liberal interpretation of the law and shall disregard informalities or omissions not affecting the substantial rights of the parties, unless it is affirmatively shown that such informalities or omissions led to a different result than would have been otherwise obtained. The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern matters of pleading and practice as nearly as may be. Costs may be assessed or apportioned among contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of judgments of the district court shall be as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 292, § 2.

CSA:

C. 41, § 158.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-4.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2208, § 23, effective July 1, 2004.

7-44-105. Application to prior associations.

Sections 7-44-103 and 7-44-104 also apply to any water users' association formed under the law of this state prior to February 18, 1929.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 293, § 3.

CSA:

C. 41, § 159.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-5.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2208, § 24, effective July 1, 2004.

7-44-106. Water users' association petition in district court - when.

Where any water users' association formed under the law of this state has entered into or proposes to enter into a contract with the United States for the payment by the association of the construction and other charges of a federal reclamation project constructed or under construction within this state, and where the funds for the payment of such charges are to be obtained by the association from assessments levied upon the stock of such association and constituting liens upon the lands of such stockholders, the association, in any case where the said contract or proposed contract would modify or affect any individual contracts between the United States and such stockholders or between the association and such stockholders, may file in the district court of the county in which the office of such water users' association is situated, a petition entitled "........ water users' association against the stockholders of said association and the owners and mortgagees of land within the ........ federal reclamation project". No other or more specific description of the defendants shall be required.

In the petition it may be stated that the association has entered into or proposes to enter into a contract with the United States, to be set out in full in said petition, with a prayer that the court find the contract to be valid, and a modification of any individual contracts between the United States and the stockholders of said association or between the association and its stockholders, insofar as any individual contracts are at variance with such association contract. Thereupon a notice in the nature of a summons shall issue under the hand and seal of the clerk of the court stating in brief outline the contents of said petition and showing where a full copy of the contract or proposed contract may be examined, such notice to be directed to the said defendants under the same general designations, which shall be deemed sufficient to give the court jurisdiction of all matters involved and parties interested.

Service shall be obtained by publication of this notice as in the case of publication of summons in an action to quiet title to real property and by the posting of the notice and complete copy of the contract or proposed contract in the office of the association and at three other public places within the boundaries of such federal reclamation project. Any stockholder in the plaintiff association or owner or mortgagee of land within a federal reclamation project affected by the contract proposed to be made by the association may answer said petition within twenty days or such further time as may be allowed therefor by the court. The failure of any person affected by the said contract to answer shall be construed, so far as that person is concerned, as an acknowledgment of the validity of the said association contract and as a consent to the modification of the said individual contracts with the association or with the United States, to the extent that such modification is required to cause the said individual contracts to conform to the terms of the contract or proposed contract between the plaintiff and the United States. All persons filing answers shall be entered as defendants in said cause and their defenses consolidated for hearing or trial.

At the hearing the court shall examine all matters in controversy and shall enter judgment and decree as the case warrants, showing how and to what extent, if any, the individual contracts of the defendants or under which they claim are modified by the association's contract or proposed contract with the United States. In reaching its conclusions in such causes, the court shall follow a liberal interpretation of the law and shall disregard informalities or omissions not affecting the substantial rights of the parties, unless it is affirmatively shown that these informalities or omissions led to a different result than would have been obtained otherwise. The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern matters of pleading and practice as nearly as may be. Costs may be assessed or apportioned among contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment of the district court shall be as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 265, § 1.

CSA:

C. 46, § 160.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-6.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2208, § 25, effective July 1, 2004.

7-44-107. Associations may extend corporate life.

Any water users' association formed under the law of this state may amend its articles of incorporation so as to extend the life of the association to any date not later than one hundred years from the date of the approval, February 13, 1931.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 268, § 2.

CSA:

C. 41, § 161.

CRS 53:

§ 31-16-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-16-7.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2209, § 26, effective July 1, 2004.